Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Records.

§79-4-16.01.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all shareholders, in alphabetical order by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each.

A corporation shall maintain its records in the form of a document, including an electronic record, or in another form capable of conversion into paper form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles or restated articles of incorporation, all amendments to them currently in effect and any notices to shareholders referred to in Section 79-4-1.20(k)(5) regarding facts on which a filed document is dependent;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all shareholders’ meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to shareholders generally within the past three (3) years, including the financial statements furnished for the past three (3) years under Section 79-4-16.20;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent annual report delivered to the Secretary of State under Section 79-4-16.22.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1601; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 43, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment added “and any notices to shareholders referred to in Section 79-4-1.20(k)(5) regarding facts on which a filed document is dependent” at the end of (e)(1).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “maintain its records in the form of a document, including an electronic record” for “maintain its records in written form” in (d).

Shareholder’s right to inspect and copy any corporate records required to be kept by this section, see § 79-4-16.02.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 278 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 425, Reasonableness of Corporate Officer’s Compensation.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 253.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-16.02.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

Subject to Section 79-4-16.03(c), a shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in Section 79-4-16.01(e) if he gives the corporation a signed written notice of his demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) and gives the corporation a signed written notice of his demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, records of any action of a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection (a) of this section;

Accounting records of the corporation; and

The record of shareholders.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records identified in subsection (b) only if:

His demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

He describes with reasonable particularity his purpose and the records he desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with his purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under Section 79-4-7.20 or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant;

The power of a court, independently of Section 79-4-1.01 et seq., to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on his behalf.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.02; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 44, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, inserted “a signed” preceding “written notice of his demand” in (a) and (b).

Authority for shareholder, his agent or attorney to inspect and, subject to requirements of § 79-4-16.02, copy shareholders’ list, see § 79-4-7.20.

Scope of shareholder’s right to copy records under § 79-4-16.02, see § 79-4-16.03.

Court-ordered inspection in copying of records at corporation’s expense when corporation does not allow shareholder to inspect and copy records under § 79-4-16.02, see § 79-4-16.04.

Attorney is not entitled to damages against professional association because of its failure to allow him access to corporate records, where he failed to specifically plead this item of special damages. Fuselier, Ott & McKee, P.A. v. Moeller, 507 So. 2d 63, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2467 (Miss. 1987).

Purposes for which stockholder or officer may exercise right to examine corporate books and records. 15 A.L.R.2d 11.

Stockholder’s right to inspect books and records of foreign corporation. 19 A.L.R.3d 869.

Who has possession, custody or control of corporate books or records for purposes of order to produce. 47 A.L.R.3d 676.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

Right of stockholder to inspect corporate books or records in pursuit of social or political interest, as distinguished from financial interest. 50 A.L.R.3d 1056.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 285 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1035.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 239 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 425, Reasonableness of Corporate Officer’s Compensation.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 590-600.

§79-4-16.03.
Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder represented.

The right to copy records under Section 79-4-16.02 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies by xerographic or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder.

The corporation may comply at its expense with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under Section 79-4-16.02(b)(3) by providing the shareholder with a list of shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder’s demand.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production, reproduction or transmission of the records.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.03; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), substituted “represented” for “he represents”; in (b), deleted “made” following “receive copies” and “photographic” preceding “xerographic,” added “including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder”; inserted (c); deleted former (d); and redesignated former (c) as present (d).

Shareholder’s right to inspect and copy any corporate records required to be kept by § 79-4-16.01(e), see § 79-4-16.02.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

§79-4-16.04.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with Section 79-4-16.02(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder who complies with Section 79-4-16.02(b) and (c) may apply to the chancery court in the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.04; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 49, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located” in (a) and (b).

Both the statute involving shareholders’ rights to inspect corporate records and the statute involving a director’s inspection of corporate records allow trial courts to impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records; the chancery court did not abuse its discretion in imposing the restrictions in this case. Flowers v. Boolos (In re Estate of Smith), 204 So.3d 291, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 370 (Miss. 2016).

Who has possession, custody, or control of corporate books or records for purposes of order to produce.
47 A.L.R.3d 676.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Attorneys’ fees; cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court. 73 A.L.R.4th 938.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 339 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 600.

§79-4-16.05.
Inspection of records by director.

A director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records and documents of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director’s duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation.

The chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may order inspection and copying of the books, records and documents at the corporation’s expense, upon application of a director who has been refused such inspection rights, unless the corporation establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate a duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the director for the director’s costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred in connection with the application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 21; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 50, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office (or if none in the state, its registered office) is located” preceding “may order inspection” in (b).

Chancery court’s order complied with the relevant statutes by allowing the heir, as director, access to the books and records, with restrictions, and there was no abuse of discretion; she did not explain what documents she was prevented from reviewing, nor did she allege that the documents she was given were incomplete. Flowers v. Boolos (In re Estate of Smith), 204 So.3d 291, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 370 (Miss. 2016).

Both the statute involving shareholders’ rights to inspect corporate records and the statute involving a director’s inspection of corporate records allow trial courts to impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records; the chancery court did not abuse its discretion in imposing the restrictions in this case. Flowers v. Boolos (In re Estate of Smith), 204 So.3d 291, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 370 (Miss. 2016).

§79-4-16.06.
Exception to notice requirement.

Whenever notice would otherwise be required to be given under any provision of this act to a shareholder, such notice need not be given if:

Notices to the shareholders of two (2) consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between such two (2) consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered; or

All, but not less than two (2), payments or dividends on securities during a twelve-month period, or two (2) consecutive payments of dividends on securities during a period of more than twelve (12) months, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered.

If any such shareholder shall deliver to the corporation a written notice setting forth such shareholder’s then current address, the requirement that notice be given to such shareholder shall be reinstated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 22; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 45, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “notice would otherwise be required” for “notice is required in” in (a); in (a)(1), substituted “Notices to the shareholders” for “Notice” at the beginning and inserted “or could not be delivered” at the end; and added “or could not be delivered” at the end of (a)(2).